Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.090

Removal of appointive officers—Filling of vacancy.

At the time of making any removal from office, the governor shall appoint some proper person to fill the office, who shall forthwith demand and receive from the officer removed the papers, records, and property of the state pertaining to the office, and shall perform the duties of the office and receive the compensation thereof until his or her successor is appointed.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5019; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.090. Prior: 1893 c 101 s 3; RRS s 10990.]